California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) If a timely petition for reassessment is not filed in accordance with the notice provided by the board pursuant to Section 758, an escape assessment or roll correction shall become final at the expiration of the period for filing a petition for reassessment specified by that notice.

(b) The board may extend the period for filing a petition for reassessment once for a period not to exceed 15 days, provided a written request for the extension is filed with the board prior to the expiration of the period for which the extension may be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

760.

(a) If any amount assessed by the board becomes delinquent on the secured roll, the tax collector may utilize those procedures for the collection of taxes on the unsecured roll to collect the amount assessed by the board.

(b) Not less than 60 days prior to initiating procedures applicable to the collection of delinquent taxes on the unsecured roll pursuant to this section, the tax collector shall send a notice of delinquency stating intent to enforce collection.

(c) The notice required by subdivision (b) shall set forth the following information:

(1) The name of the assessee.

(2) The description of the property assessed.

(3) The assessed value of the property.

(4) The fact that collection will be enforced on the unsecured roll in the amount of the tax, penalty, interest and actual costs of collection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 116, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Property Statements [826. - 834.]

826.

Upon request of the board, a person shall submit a property statement pertaining to any state-assessed property owned, claimed, possessed, used, controlled, or managed by him, in the form prescribed by the board.

(a) The statement shall be made under oath and filed with the board.

(b) In the case of a corporation, the property statement shall be signed either by an officer of the corporation or an employee or agent who has been designated in writing by the board of directors to sign such statement on behalf of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1035.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

The statement shall show specifically any information required by the board in order to assess State assessed property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

828.

Any person with knowledge or records pertinent to the appraisal of state-assessed property shall make them available to the board on request. The person shall make available at his principal place of business, principal location, or principal address in California, or at a place mutually agreeable to the board and the person, a true copy of business records relevant to the amount, cost, and value of all property that he owns, claims, possesses, or controls within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 516.)
-------------------------------------------

829.

Failure of the board to demand or secure the property statement does not render any assessment invalid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

830.

(a) If the request of the board is mailed before the lien date as defined in Section 722, the property statement shall be filed with the board by March 1, and shall be in such detail as the board may prescribe.

(b) If the request of the board is mailed on or after the first day of January following the lien date, the property statement shall be filed with the board within 60 days after the request is mailed.

(c) Except as hereinafter provided, if any person fails to file the property statement, in whole or in part, by March 1, or by that later date to which the filing period is extended pursuant to subdivision (b) or
 Section 830.1, a penalty shall be added to the full value of the assessment of so much of the property as is not timely reported as follows:

(1) For any part of the property statement relating to the development of the unit value of operating property, the penalty shall be 10 percent of the unit value.

(2) For any part of the property statement, not relating to the development of the unit value of operating property, that lists or describes specific operating property, the penalty shall be 10 percent of the allocated value of the property, which penalty shall be added to the unit value.

(3) For any part of the property statement that lists or describes specific nonunitary property, the penalty shall be 10 percent of the value of the property.

(4) If the
 failure to timely file a property statement is due to a fraudulent or willful attempt to evade the tax, a penalty of 25 percent of the assessed value of the estimated assessment shall be added to the assessment. A willful failure to file a property statement as required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 826) shall be deemed to be a willful attempt to evade the tax.

(5) No penalty added pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) may exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) of full value. In addition, if a penalty has been added pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3), if a claim for refund seeking the recovery of that penalty has been filed by the state assessee contesting the penalty within three months of the due date of the second installment, and the state assessee initiates an action in the superior court within one year of the filing of the claim for refund, the state assessee is not subject to any further penalties on subsequent
 assessments for failure to comply with any subsequent request seeking information or data with respect to the same issue as set forth in the claim for refund filed within the time limits set forth above, until the assessment year after a final decision of the court, and then only with respect to a failure to comply with a request for information with respect to assessments after a final decision of the court. For purposes of this paragraph, “same issue” means the type of information that is the subject of the disputed request for information.

(d) Any person who subscribes to the board’s tax rate area change service and who receives a change mailed between April 1 and May 1, shall file a corrected statement no later than May 30 with respect to those parts of the property statement that are affected by the change.

If that person receives a change mailed after May 1, a corrected statement shall be filed
 no later than the 60th day following the mailing of that change.

(e) Penalties incurred for filings received after June 30 may be included with the assessments for the succeeding fiscal year.

(f) If the assessee establishes to the satisfaction of the board that the failure to file the property statement or any of its parts within the time required by this section was due to reasonable cause and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the board shall order the penalty abated, in whole or in part, provided the assessee has filed with the board written application for abatement of the penalty within the time prescribed by law for the filing of applications for assessment reductions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 13.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

830.1.

Notwithstanding Section 15620 of the Government Code, the board, by order entered upon its minutes and for good cause shown, may extend the time fixed for filing portions of the property statement as follows:

(a) For any part of the property statement relating to the development of the unit value of operating property, an extension not exceeding 45 days may be granted.

(b) For any part of the property statement, not relating to the development of the unit value of operating property, that lists or describes specific operating property, an extension not exceeding 30 days may be granted.

(c) For any part of the property statement that lists or describes specific nonunitary property, an extension not exceeding 30 days may be granted.

(d) If an extension is granted pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c), an additional 15-day extension may be granted upon the showing of extraordinary circumstances which prevent the filing of the statement within the first extension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 407, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

831.

On forms and at times prescribed by the board, it may require the assessor of any county or city to report any information in his possession concerning the value of State assessed property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

832.

The board may call on any State department, board, bureau, or commission for any assistance it can render.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

833.

(a) Except as provided herein, all information required by the board or furnished in the property statement shall be held secret by the board and by any person or entity acquiring this information pursuant to subdivision (c). Information and records in the board’s office which are not required to be kept or prepared by the board are not public documents and are not open to public inspection.

(b) This section shall not apply to maps filed pursuant to Section 326.

(c) Except as provided in Section 38706, the board may provide any assessment data in its possession to the assessor of any county. When requested by resolution of the board of supervisors of any county, or the city council of any city which prepares its own local roll, the board shall permit the auditor or the assessor of the county or city, or any duly authorized deputy or employee of that officer, to examine any and all records of the board.

(d) The board shall disclose information, furnish abstracts or permit access to any and all of its records to or by law enforcement agencies, grand juries, and other duly authorized legislative or administrative officials of the state pursuant to their authorization to examine these records.

(e) The board also may disclose information, records, and appraisal data relating to state assessment of companies engaged in interstate commerce to tax officials of other states having duties corresponding to those described by this chapter. This disclosure shall be limited to instances in which there is a reciprocal exchange of information by the states in which the interstate companies operate, and shall be made only pursuant to a written agreement between the agencies involved. This agreement shall provide that any request for information be in writing, shall specify the information to be exchanged, and shall require that any information furnished be used solely for tax administration purposes and otherwise shall be held secret. This agreement shall also provide that any information furnished be disclosed only to those persons whose duties or responsibilities require access and shall require that necessary safeguards be implemented to protect the confidentiality of the information. The request for information and any written material furnished pursuant to the request shall be open to inspection by the person to whom the information relates at the office of the board in Sacramento.

(f) Upon receiving any request for confidential information from any person or entity described in subdivision (c) or (e), the board shall promptly notify the state assessee to which the request relates of the identity of the person or entity requesting the information and a description of the information sought. Upon sending any information in response to the request, the board shall simultaneously provide to the state assessee to which the request relates notification describing the information so transmitted and the identity of the person or entity to whom the information was transmitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 407, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

834.

The board may destroy any documents containing information obtained from taxpayers when six years have elapsed since the lien date for the taxes for which that information was obtained. Those documents may be destroyed when three years have elapsed since the lien date if the documents have been microfilmed, microfiched, imaged, or otherwise preserved on a medium that provides access to the documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 583, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. State Assessed Property Escaping Assessment [861. - 868.]

861.

If any property subject to assessment by the board pursuant to Section 19 of Article XIII of the Constitution escapes assessment, the board shall assess it in accordance with Section 864 at its value on the lien date of the year in which it escaped assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

862.

When an assessee, after a request by the board, fails to file a property statement by the date specified in Section 830 or files with the board a property statement or report on a form prescribed by the board with respect to state-assessed property and the statement fails to report any taxable tangible property information accurately, regardless of whether or not this information is available to the assessee, to the extent that these failures cause the board not to assess the property or to assess it at a lower valuation than it would have if the property information had been reported accurately, the property shall be assessed in accordance with Section 864, and a penalty of 10 percent shall be added to the additional assessment. If the failure to report or the failure
 to report accurately is willful or fraudulent, a penalty of 25 percent shall be added to the additional assessment. If the assessee establishes to the satisfaction of the board that the failure to file an accurate property statement was due to reasonable cause and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the board shall order the penalty abated, in whole or in part, provided that the assessee has filed with the board written application for abatement of the penalty within the time prescribed by law for the filing of applications for assessment reductions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 14.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

863.

If any state assessee or his agent willfully conceals, fails to disclose, removes, transfers, or misrepresents state-assessed property in order to evade taxation and this action results in state-assessed property escaping assessment, or if any state assessee or his agent through fraudulent act or fraudulent omission or through collusion between the state assessee or his agent and the board, its officers, or employees causes any state-assessed property to escape assessment, a penalty shall be imposed as follows:

(a) Insofar as values escaping assessment are part of the unit value, 25 percent of the additional unit assessed value shall be added to the unallocated unit assessment.

(b) Insofar as the values escaping assessment relate to the assessment of nonunitary property, 25 percent of the additional assessment shall be added to the nonunitary assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

864.

(a) Property which is found to have escaped assessment may either be added to the roll for the fiscal year in which it is discovered or included with the assessments for the succeeding fiscal year. To the escaped assessment, there shall be added, in lieu of interest, three-quarters of 1 percent of the escaped assessed value for each month or fraction thereof from December 10 of the year in which the escaped assessment should have been enrolled to the date the escaped assessment is added to the board roll; provided, however, that an assessment in lieu of interest shall not be added if the escape was due to an error, other than an erroneous opinion of value, on the part of the board. The property shall be taxed at the rates applicable to assessments on the roll to which it is added.

(b) If the escaped assessment is made as a result of an audit which discloses that property assessed to the party audited has been excessively assessed for any year covered by the audit which falls within the period provided for corrections under Section 4876, the excessive assessments together with any assessment in lieu of interest under subdivision (c) shall be an offset against proposed escaped assessments, including accumulated penalties and additional assessments in lieu of interest. If the excessive assessments exceed the escaped assessments, including penalties and assessments in lieu of interest, the excess may either be credited to the roll for the fiscal year in which it is discovered or deducted from the assessment for the succeeding fiscal year.

(c) Whenever the excessive assessments were due to clerical errors or other errors by the board not involving exercise of judgment, there shall be added, in lieu of interest, three-quarters of 1 percent of the excessive assessment for each month or fraction thereof, from December 10 of the year in which the excessive assessment was enrolled to the date the excessive assessment is credited to the board roll or to the date the excessive assessment is deducted from the assessment from the succeeding fiscal year, as provided in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

865.

When the value of a state assessee’s unitary property that lies in more than one tax-rate area has been underallocated to one or more tax-rate areas and overallocated by a like amount to one or more other tax-rate areas for any reason, the misallocation shall be corrected by the board either by orders directing local auditors to amend the rolls for the fiscal year in which the misallocation is discovered or by changes on the board rolls for the fiscal year succeeding discovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

866.

Any assessment to which the penalty provided in Section 863 must be added shall be made within six years of July 1 of the assessment year in which the property escaped assessment. Any other escaped assessment shall be made within four years of July 1 of the assessment year in which the property escaped assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

867.

An assessment made pursuant to this article against real property for the year or years in which such real property escaped assessment shall not create or impose a lien or charge on such real property for taxes, interest, or penalty if (1) such real property has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value prior to the date of such assessment and the showing thereof on the secured roll with the date of entry specified thereon; or (2) such real property is subject to a lien of a bona fide encumbrance for value created and attaching prior to the date of such assessment and the showing thereof on the secured roll with the date of entry specified thereon. In such cases, the tax collector may record with the county recorder of any county a certificate which shall set forth the name of the person who would have been the assessee in the year in which such real property escaped assessment and the amount or amounts of any such assessments and penalties. From the date of the recording of such certificate, a lien shall be created and shall attach against any real property owned by such person in the county or counties in which any such certificates may have been recorded, which lien shall have the force, effect and priority of a judgment lien.

The tax collector, with the approval of the board of supervisors, may at any time release all or any portion of real property subject to any lien created or attaching by the recording of such a certificate from such lien or subordinate such lien to other liens and encumbrances if he or she determines that the assessment or taxes are sufficiently secured by a lien on other property belonging to the person named in such a certificate or that the release or subordination will not endanger or jeopardize the collection of such assessment or taxes.

A written certification by the tax collector to the effect that real property subject to any lien imposed by the recording of the certificate as hereinbefore provided has been released from such lien or that such lien has been subordinated to other liens shall be conclusive evidence as to any bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or lessee that such lien has been released or has been subordinated as set forth in such written certification. Such written certification may be recorded with the county recorder of any county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

868.

If, before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 866 for making an escape assessment, the taxpayer has consented in writing to allow an assessment after that time, the assessment may be made by the board at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 18.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Special Types of Property [982. - 1162.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [982. - 998.]

982.

The undistributed or unpartitioned property of deceased persons may be assessed to the heirs, guardians, conservators, executors, or administrators. A payment of taxes by any one of them binds each of the other parties in interest for his proportionate share.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

982.1.

If real property of a deceased person is distributed to the State because there are no known heirs or because the estate or any portion thereof is to be distributed to heirs, devisees, or legatees whose whereabouts are unknown, such real property shall be assessed to the estate of the decedent and to the State of California. Such assessment shall involve no liability on the part of the State to pay taxes except as provided by Sections 4986.5 and 4986.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 122.)
-------------------------------------------

983.

Property in litigation in possession of a county treasurer, court, county clerk, or receiver shall be assessed to the officer in possession, and the taxes shall be paid under the direction of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

984.

Water ditches constructed for mining, manufacturing, or irrigation purposes and toll roads shall be assessed like real estate, at a rate per mile for that portion of the property lying within the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

985.

Every toll bridge connecting two or more counties shall be assessed in equal proportions in the counties it connects.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

986.

The full value of a work of art, still owned by the artist who created it and which has never been sold nor exhibited for profit, is the full value of the materials which constitute the work of art.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

987.

The assessment of lands owned by a local government that are located outside its boundaries shall be as specified in Section ll of Article XIII of the Constitution. The State Board of Equalization shall compute for each assessment year, on or before the lien date of that assessment year, the ratio to be applied to land assessed as of the 1966 lien date and the ratio to be applied to land assessed as of the 1967 lien date in the manner specified in subdivision (b) of Section 11 of Article XIII of the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

988.

(a) The full value of motion pictures, including the negatives and prints thereof, is the full value of only the tangible materials upon which such motion pictures are recorded. Such full value does not include the value of, or any value based upon, any intangible rights, such as the copyright or the right to reproduce, copy, exhibit or otherwise exploit motion pictures or the negatives or prints thereof.

(b) As used in this section, “motion pictures” includes those intended for transmission, exhibition, or exploitation, by any means or method and whether or not production thereof has been completed.

(c) As used in this section, “negatives and prints” includes any film or other tangible property, and reproductions thereof, upon which is recorded by any means or method the sound or action of motion pictures, in positive, negative, or any other form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

989.

Unredeemed pledged goods in the possession of a pawnbroker, but not owned by him to hold and dispose of as his property, shall not be assessed to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

990.

Where migratory livestock are ranged in two or more counties during the year, the assessors of the counties interested may meet and prorate the number of stock to be assessed in each county, taking into consideration the time such stock ranged in each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 542.)
-------------------------------------------

994.

The following vehicles and equipment, with the exception of implements of husbandry which are subject to the provisions of Sections 410 to 414, inclusive, shall be subject to the provisions of this section, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10758:

(a) Steel-wheeled and track-laying equipment shall not be subject to the license fees imposed pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of this code, but shall be assessed in the county where it has situs on the lien date.

(b) Rubber-tired equipment, except commercial vehicles and cranes registered under the Vehicle Code and which are licensed under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of this code, which must be moved or operated under permit issued pursuant to Section 35780 of the Vehicle Code, shall be assessed in the county where it has situs on the lien date, but the assessee of such property shall be allowed to deduct from the amount of property tax the amount of any fee paid on such vehicle under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of this code, if such fee is paid prior to the lien date for the calendar year in which the lien date occurs.

(c) Rubber-tired cranes and commercial vehicles which must be moved or operated under permit issued pursuant to Section 35780 of the Vehicle Code, and rubber-tired equipment that does not require a permit, which cranes, vehicles, and equipment are registered under the Vehicle Code and licensed under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of this code, shall not be otherwise assessed for purposes of property taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

995.

Storage media for computer programs shall be valued on the 1972 lien date and thereafter as if there were no computer program on such media except basic operational programs. Otherwise, computer programs shall not be valued for purpose of property taxation.

As used in this section, storage media for computer programs may take the form of, but are not limited to, punched cards, tapes, discs or drums on which computer programs may be embodied or stored.

As used in this section, a computer program may be, but is not limited to a set of written instructions, magnetic imprints, required documentation or other process designed to enable the user to communicate with or operate a computer or other machinery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 990.)
-------------------------------------------

995.2.

The term “basic operational program,” as used in Section 995, means a computer program that is fundamental and necessary to the functioning of a computer. A basic operational program is that part of an operating system including supervisors, monitors, executives, and control or master programs that consist of the control program elements of that system.

For purposes of this section, the terms “control program” and “basic operational program” are interchangeable. A control program, as opposed to a processing program, controls the operation of a computer by managing the allocation of all system resources, including the central processing unit, main storage, input/output devices and processing programs. A processing program is used to develop and implement the specific applications that the computer is to perform. Its operation is possible only through the facilities provided by the control program. It is not in itself fundamental and necessary to the functioning of a computer.

Excluded from the term “basic operational program” are processing programs, which consist of language translators, including, but not limited to, assemblers and compilers; service programs, including, but not limited to, data set utilities, sort/merge utilities, and emulators; data management systems, also known as generalized file-processing software; and application programs, including, but not limited to, payroll, inventory control, and production control. Also excluded from the term “basic operational program” are programs or parts of programs developed for or by a user if they were developed solely for the solution of an individual operational problem of the user.

A control program, as used in this section, includes the following functions: selection, assignment, and control of input and output devices; loading of programs, including selection of programs from a system resident library; handling the steps necessary to accomplish job-to-job transition; controlling the allocation of memory; controlling concurrent operation of multiple programs or computers; and protecting data from being inadvertently destroyed as a result of operator program error.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

996.

(a) Returnable containers shall be assessed only to the person in possession thereof on the lien date, provided such person is not under a legally enforceable duty to return the containers for reuse. For the purpose of this section, a person is not under a legally enforceable duty to return returnable containers for reuse merely because such person has the right to return such containers at his election for a sum of money equal to the deposit or similar charge paid by him upon his acquisition of the containers.

(b) If a deposit or similar charge is paid by the buyer of the contents with respect to returnable containers assessable in the manner provided by this section, the cash value of such returnable containers after initial use shall be the cost of such containers, less depreciation, but shall not be less than the deposit or similar charge.

(c) As used in this section the term “returnable containers” means containers used to package soft drink beverages and of a kind customarily returned by the buyer of the contents for reuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1044.)
-------------------------------------------

997.

(a) The cash value of records of persons engaged in a business or profession for purposes of this division is the cash value only of the tangible material upon which, or in which, such records are recorded, maintained or stored. Such cash value shall be determined without inclusion of or consideration of the intangible value of the information or data so recorded, maintained or stored, nor the intangible right to utilize such information or data.

(b) As used in this section “records” includes all written documents and photographic reproductions thereof, recorded data, research notes, calculations, and indices maintained or utilized by persons engaged in a business or profession. 

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a determination of full cash value for (1) books, (2) old newspapers on microfilm, (3) computer programs and storage media for such programs taxable pursuant to Section 995, (4) records which are held for sale in the ordinary course of business, or (5) records which are purchased from a person who held such records in an inventory of goods for sale in the ordinary course of business. Records sold only when a business is sold shall not be considered as “held for sale in the ordinary course of business.”

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the consideration of research and development, engineering or similar costs in the valuation of tangible property, other than records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

998.

(a) The full value of a time-share estate or a time-share use subject to tax under this division shall be determined by finding the real property value of the interest involved and shall not include the value of any nonreal property items, including, but not limited to, vacation exchange rights, vacation conveniences and services, and club memberships. Accordingly, the full value of a time-share estate or time-share use may be determined by reference to resort properties, condominiums, cooperatives, or other properties which are similar in size, type, and location to the property subject to time-share ownership and are not owned on a time-share basis. The aggregate assessed value of all the time-share estates or uses relating to a single lot, parcel, unit, or other segment of real property shall be determined by adding (1) the fair market value of the similar lot, parcel, unit, or other segment not owned on a time-share basis, and (2) an amount necessary to reflect any increase or decrease to the market value attributable to the fact that the property is marketed in increments of time, or by any alternate method which will determine the real property value without regard to any nonreal property items which may be included.

(b) Nothing in this section shall authorize a reassessment of real property as a result of the creation or transfer of a time-share interest in the property unless the creation or transfer of the time-share interest constitutes a change in ownership under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 60) of Part 2 and Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(c) For purposes of this section, “time-share estate” and “time-share use” shall have the meanings set forth in paragraph (x) of Section 11212 of the Business and Professions Code, and “time-share interest” shall refer to both time-share estates and time-share uses.

(d) Nothing in this section may be construed as requiring the assessment of any property at less than fair market value as required by Section 401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Goods in Transit [1016. - 1022.]

1016.

As used in this article, “intrastate water carrier” means a person engaged in the intrastate transportation of goods by water.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1017.

As used in this article, “goods in transit” means personal property which, on the lien date, is in transit and is possessed or controlled and managed by an intrastate water carrier.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1018.

As used in this article, “residence of the owner” means the county where the goods in transit were produced or from which the shipment was made, if the owner owns real property other than possessory interests there, or, if he does not own real property other than possessory interests there, his place of domicile.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1019.

Goods in transit have the residence of the owner as their situs for taxation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1020.

Every intrastate water carrier shall file a copy of the bill of lading or manifest for all goods in transit with the forwarding agent or warehouse proprietor for delivery to the assessor of his county. If the goods are delivered for transportation by other persons, the intrastate water carrier shall report the goods in transit to the assessor of the county from which they were received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.

The copy of the bill of lading or manifest shall show the description, value, consignor and consignee of the goods.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1022.

Every person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Vessels [1136. - 1141.]

1136.

A ferry is a place where passengers and freight are regularly transported by water between two fixed termini under authority of law so to do.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1137.

Where a ferry connects points in more than one county, the wharves, storehouses, and stationary property connected with it shall be assessed in the county where located, and the ferryboats shall be assessed in equal proportions in the counties it connects.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1138.

Vessels documented outside of this State and plying in whole or in part in its waters, the owners of which reside in this State, shall be assessed in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1139.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, when the owner or master of a taxable vessel gives written notice of its habitual place of mooring when not in service to the assessor of the county where the vessel is documented, the vessel shall be assessed only in the county where habitually moored.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1140.

Vessels, except ferryboats, regularly engaged in transporting passengers or cargo between two or more ports and vessels concerning which notice of habitual place of mooring has not been given shall be assessed only in the county where documented.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1141.

Vessels not required to be documented shall be assessed in the county where habitually moored when not in service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Certificated Aircraft [1150. - 1157.]

1150.
